Maryland, session 2026, SB0951.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
SUBTITLE 5H. ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANTS.
14–5H–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ANESTHESIOLOGIST” MEANS A PHYSICIAN LICENSED BY THE BOARD
WHO HAS COMPLETED A RESIDENCY IN ANESTHESIOLOGY APPROVED BY THE
AMERICAN BOARD OF ANESTHESIOLOGY OR THE AMERICAN OSTEOPATHIC BOARD
OF ANESTHESIOLOGY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0951*

SENATE BILL 951
(C) “ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO PERFORM AUTHORIZED ACTS UNDER THE
SUPERVISION OF AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST.
(D) “SUPERVISION” MEANS THE RESPONSIBILITY FOR IMMEDIATE
AVAILABILITY OF THE DIRECTING ANESTHESIOLOGIST FOR CONSULTATION AND
DIRECTION OF THE ACTIVITIES OF THE ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT, INCLUDING:
(1) PHYSICAL PROXIMITY THAT ALLOWS THE ANESTHESIOLOGIST TO
REESTABLISH DIRECT CONTACT WITH THE PATIENT TO MEET MEDICAL NEEDS AND
ANY URGENT OR EMERGENT CLINICAL MATTERS; AND
(2) PERSONAL PARTICIPATION BY THE DIRECTING
ANESTHESIOLOGIST IN THE MOST DEMANDING PROCEDURES OF THE ANESTHESIA
PLAN, INCLUDING, AS CLINICALLY APPROPRIATE, INDUCTION AND EMERGENCE.
(E) “SUPERVISION AGREEMENT” MEANS A WRITTEN DOCUMENT EXECUTED
BETWEEN AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT AND AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST
DESCRIBING THE SUPERVISORY RELATIONSHIP AND PRACTICE PARAMETERS
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THAT IS MAINTAINED ON–SITE AND AVAILABLE TO
THE BOARD ON REQUEST.
14–5H–02.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT LIMIT THE RIGHT OF AN INDIVIDUAL TO PRACTICE
A HEALTH OCCUPATION THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE UNDER
THIS ARTICLE.
14–5H–03.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT AUTHORIZE AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT TO
PRACTICE INDEPENDENT OF AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST.
14–5H–04.
THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING:
(1) QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE AND RENEWAL;
(2) PROCEDURES FOR LICENSURE AND RENEWAL;
(3) SUPERVISION STANDARDS;

SENATE BILL 951 3
(4) DEFAULT AND ADJUSTED NUMBER OF CONCURRENT
PROCEDURES AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST IS DIRECTING OR SUPERVISING AT ONE TIME;
(5) CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS;
(6) QUALIFICATIONS AND PROCEDURES FOR TEMPORARY AND
EXPEDITED LICENSURE;
(7) SUPERVISION AGREEMENT CONTENT AND AUDIT PROCEDURES;
AND
(8) PROCEDURES FOR THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5H–05.
(A) (1) THE BOARD SHALL SET REASONABLE FEES FOR THE ISSUANCE
AND RENEWAL OF LICENSES AND OTHER SERVICES THE BOARD PROVIDES TO
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANTS.
(2) THE FEES CHARGED SHALL BE SET SO AS TO PROVIDE FUNDS TO
APPROXIMATE THE COST OF MAINTAINING THE LICENSURE PROGRAM AND OTHER
SERVICES PROVIDED TO ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANTS.
(B) (1) THE BOARD SHALL PAY ALL FEES COLLECTED UNDER THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE TO THE COMPTROLLER.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE ALL FEES TO THE
BOARD.
(C) THE FEES SHALL BE USED TO COVER THE ACTUAL DOCUMENTED
DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF FULFILLING THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY
DUTIES OF THE BOARD AS PROVIDED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5H–06.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN
INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE LICENSED BY THE BOARD BEFORE THE INDIVIDUAL MAY
PRACTICE AS AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT IN THE STATE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:

SENATE BILL 951
(1) A STUDENT ENROLLED IN AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT
PROGRAM ACCREDITED BY THE COMMISSION ON ACCREDITATION OF ALLIED
HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS, OR A SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION, PERFORMING
ASSIGNED TASKS UNDER THE SUPERVISION OF AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST, AN
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT, OR ANY OTHER LICENSED ANESTHESIA
PROFESSIONAL; OR
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY THE UNITED STATES
GOVERNMENT WHILE THE INDIVIDUAL IS ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THAT
EMPLOYMENT.
14–5H–07.
TO QUALIFY FOR A LICENSE, AN APPLICANT MUST:
(1) BE OF GOOD MORAL CHARACTER;
(2) HAVE GRADUATED FROM AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT
PROGRAM ACCREDITED BY THE COMMISSION ON ACCREDITATION OF ALLIED
HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS OR A SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION;
(3) HAVE PASSED THE CERTIFYING EXAMINATION ADMINISTERED BY
THE NATIONAL COMMISSION ON CERTIFICATION OF ANESTHESIOLOGIST
ASSISTANTS OR A SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION, OR AN EXAMINATION APPROVED BY
THE BOARD; AND
(4) MEET ANY ADDITIONAL EDUCATION, TRAINING, OR EXAMINATION
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD.
14–5H–08.
TO APPLY FOR A LICENSE, AN APPLICANT SHALL:
(1) COMPLETE A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 14–308.1 OF THIS TITLE;
(2) SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE BOARD ON A FORM THAT THE
BOARD REQUIRES;
(3) SUBMIT TO THE BOARD ANY ATTESTATION OR DOCUMENTATION
THAT THE BOARD REQUIRES; AND
(4) PAY TO THE BOARD THE FEE SET BY THE BOARD.

SENATE BILL 951 5
14–5H–09.
(A) (1) THE TERM OF A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD MAY NOT EXCEED
3 YEARS.
(2) A LICENSE EXPIRES ON THE DATE SET BY THE BOARD UNLESS A
LICENSE IS RENEWED FOR AN ADDITIONAL TERM AS PROVIDED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) AT LEAST 1 MONTH BEFORE THE LICENSE EXPIRES, THE BOARD SHALL
SEND TO THE LICENSEE A RENEWAL NOTICE THAT STATES:
(1) THE DATE ON WHICH THE CURRENT LICENSE EXPIRES;
(2) THE DATE BY WHICH THE RENEWAL APPLICATION MUST BE
RECEIVED BY THE BOARD FOR THE RENEWAL TO BE ISSUED AND MAILED BEFORE
THE LICENSE EXPIRES; AND
(3) THE AMOUNT OF THE RENEWAL FEE.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL RENEW THE LICENSE OF A LICENSEE WHO:
(1) IS OTHERWISE ENTITLED TO BE LICENSED;
(2) PAYS TO THE BOARD THE RENEWAL FEE SET BY THE BOARD;
(3) SUBMITS TO THE BOARD:
(I) A RENEWAL APPLICATION ON THE FORM THAT THE BOARD
REQUIRES; AND
(II) SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE OF COMPLIANCE WITH ANY
CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS SET UNDER
THIS SECTION FOR LICENSE RENEWAL; AND
(4) MEETS ANY OTHER RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY
THE BOARD IN REGULATION.
(D) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS GOVERNING INACTIVE STATUS
AND THE REINSTATEMENT OF A LICENSE HOLDER.
14–5H–10.

SENATE BILL 951
(A) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION AND ANY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD, THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY
LICENSE TO A GRADUATE OF AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT PROGRAM
ACCREDITED BY THE COMMISSION ON ACCREDITATION OF ALLIED HEALTH
EDUCATION PROGRAMS WHO IS AWAITING THE NEXT ADMINISTRATION OF THE
NATIONAL COMMISSION ON CERTIFICATION OF ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANTS
EXAM.
(B) A TEMPORARY LICENSE SHALL BE IN EFFECT FOR A PERIOD NOT TO
EXCEED 12 MONTHS AS SET BY THE BOARD IN REGULATION.
(C) A TEMPORARY LICENSE AUTHORIZES AN INDIVIDUAL TO PRACTICE
SUBJECT TO THIS SUBTITLE AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD.
14–5H–11.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING AN EXPEDITED
LICENSURE PROCESS FOR AN APPLICANT WHO HOLDS A CURRENT, ACTIVE LICENSE
AS AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT IN GOOD STANDING IN ANOTHER
JURISDICTION THAT THE BOARD DESIGNATES BY REGULATION.
(B) AN APPLICANT FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE MUST MEET ANY
VERIFICATION, MORAL CHARACTER, AND CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD.
(C) THE BOARD MAY REQUIRE EVIDENCE OF SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT
EDUCATION, TRAINING, AND EXAMINATION FOR AN APPLICANT FOR EXPEDITED
LICENSURE UNDER THIS SECTION.
14–5H–12.
(A) AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT MAY NOT EXCEED THE SCOPE OF A
SUPERVISING ANESTHESIOLOGIST’S PRACTICE.
(B) AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT MAY PERFORM DUTIES AND
RESPONSIBILITIES DELEGATED BY THE SUPERVISING ANESTHESIOLOGIST FOR
WHICH THE ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT IS COMPETENT THROUGH EDUCATION,
TRAINING, AND EXPERIENCE, INCLUDING:
(1) CONDUCTING PRE– AND POST–ANESTHESIA EVALUATIONS;
(2) DOCUMENTING PATIENT PROGRESS NOTES;

SENATE BILL 951 7
(3) OBTAINING INFORMED CONSENT FOR ANESTHESIA OR RELATED
PROCEDURES;
(4) UNDER THE SUPERVISING ANESTHESIOLOGIST’S CONSULTATION
AND DIRECTION, ORDERING:
(I) PERIOPERATIVE MEDICATIONS AND FLUIDS; OR
(II) CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES FOR USE ONLY AT THE FACILITY
WHERE ORDERED AND WITH TIMELY CO–SIGNATURE BY THE SUPERVISING
ANESTHESIOLOGIST CONSISTENT WITH FACILITY POLICY;
(5) PERFORMING ADVANCED AIRWAY INTERVENTIONS;
(6) ESTABLISHING PERIPHERAL, CENTRAL, AND ARTERIAL LINES;
(7) PERFORMING INDUCTION, MAINTENANCE, AND EMERGENCE;
(8) PERFORMING PLACEMENT AND MANAGEMENT OF NEURAXIAL
AND REGIONAL ANESTHESIA;
(9) ADMINISTERING VASOACTIVE PHARMACEUTICALS AND
INFUSIONS;
(10) ADMINISTERING BLOOD AND FLUIDS;
(11) ADMINISTERING ANESTHETIC MEDICATIONS, ADJUVANT
PHARMACEUTICALS, AND ACCESSORY PHARMACEUTICALS;
(12) PERFORMING CARDIOPULMONARY RESUSCITATION AND
EMERGENCY RESPONSE;
(13) PROVIDING ANESTHESIA EDUCATION AND TRAINING;
(14) PARTICIPATING IN ADMINISTRATIVE, RESEARCH, AND CLINICAL
TEACHING ACTIVITIES AS AUTHORIZED BY THE SUPERVISING ANESTHESIOLOGIST;
AND
(15) PERFORMING OTHER TASKS NOT PROHIBITED BY LAW.
(C) AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT MAY NOT INDEPENDENTLY
PRESCRIBE, ORDER, COMPOUND, OR DISPENSE DRUGS, MEDICATIONS, OR DEVICES.

SENATE BILL 951
(D) AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT MAY SIGN AND ATTEST TO ANY
CERTIFICATES, CARDS, FORMS, OR OTHER REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION THAT THE
SUPERVISING ANESTHESIOLOGIST MAY SIGN, IF THE ACT IS WITHIN THE
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT’S AUTHORIZED SCOPE OF PRACTICE.
(E) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) PREVENT AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT FROM ACCESSING
AND OBTAINING DRUGS AS DIRECTED BY THE SUPERVISING ANESTHESIOLOGIST; OR
(2) PROHIBIT A STUDENT ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT WHO IS
ENROLLED IN A PROGRAM ACCREDITED BY THE COMMISSION ON ACCREDITATION
OF ALLIED HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS, OR A SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION,
FROM ENGAGING IN ACTS THAT CONSTITUTE THE PRACTICE OF AN
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT AS PART OF THE STUDENT’S CLINICAL EDUCATION
UNDER APPROPRIATE SUPERVISION.
14–5H–13.
(A) AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT MAY PRACTICE ONLY UNDER
SUPERVISION AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION AND UNDER REGULATIONS
ADOPTED BY THE BOARD.
(B) (1) UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY
THE BOARD, AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST MAY NOT SUPERVISE MORE THAN FOUR
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANTS AT ANY ONE TIME.
(2) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS AUTHORIZING DIFFERENT
RATIOS OF SUPERVISION WITH APPROPRIATE SAFEGUARDS AND MAY RECOGNIZE
GROUP–BASED SUPERVISION AND BACKUP ARRANGEMENTS.
(C) (1) EACH ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT SHALL PRACTICE UNDER A
WRITTEN SUPERVISION AGREEMENT WITH ONE OR MORE ANESTHESIOLOGISTS.
(2) THE SUPERVISION AGREEMENT:
(I) SHALL BE MAINTAINED ON–SITE AT EACH PRACTICE
LOCATION;
(II) IS NOT SUBJECT TO PREAPPROVAL; AND
(III) SHALL BE AVAILABLE TO THE BOARD ON REQUEST.

SENATE BILL 951 9
(3) THE SUPERVISION AGREEMENT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) PARTIES AND PRACTICE LOCATIONS;
(II) PROVISIONS DETAILING SUPERVISION AND BACKUP
SUPERVISION;
(III) PROCESSES FOR CLINICAL REVIEW AND QUALITY
ASSURANCE;
(IV) EMERGENCY PROCEDURES;
(V) ANY APPLICABLE FACILITY OR SYSTEM PROTOCOLS; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE BOARD.
(4) THE BOARD MAY AUDIT SUPERVISION AGREEMENTS FOR
COMPLIANCE AND TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5H–14.
ONLY A PERSON LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY USE THE TITLES
“ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT”, “AA”, “CERTIFIED ANESTHESIOLOGIST
ASSISTANT”, OR “CAA” OR OTHERWISE REPRESENT THEMSELVES AS BEING
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT IN THE STATE.
14–5H–15.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE HEARING PROVISIONS OF § 14–405 OF THIS TITLE, A
DISCIPLINARY PANEL, ON THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A MAJORITY OF THE QUORUM
OF THE DISCIPLINARY PANEL, MAY DENY A LICENSE TO ANY APPLICANT,
REPRIMAND ANY LICENSEE, PLACE ANY LICENSEE ON PROBATION, OR SUSPEND OR
REVOKE A LICENSE, IF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE:
(1) FRAUDULENTLY OR DECEPTIVELY OBTAINS OR ATTEMPTS TO
OBTAIN A LICENSE FOR THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE OR FOR ANOTHER;
(2) FRAUDULENTLY OR DECEPTIVELY USES A LICENSE;
(3) IS GUILTY OF:
(I) IMMORAL CONDUCT WHILE PRACTICING AS AN
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT; OR

SENATE BILL 951
(II) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT WHILE PRACTICING AS AN
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT;
(4) IS:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY INCOMPETENT;
(5) ABANDONS A PATIENT;
(6) IS HABITUALLY INTOXICATED;
(7) IS ADDICTED TO OR HABITUALLY ABUSES ANY NARCOTIC OR
CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE, AS DEFINED IN § 5–101 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE;
(8) PROVIDES PROFESSIONAL SERVICES WHILE:
(I) UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL; OR
(II) USING ANY NARCOTIC OR CONTROLLED DANGEROUS
SUBSTANCE, AS DEFINED IN § 5–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, OR ANY
OTHER DRUG THAT IS IN EXCESS OF THERAPEUTIC AMOUNTS OR WITHOUT VALID
MEDICAL INDICATION;
(9) PROMOTES THE SALE OF SERVICES, DRUGS, DEVICES,
APPLIANCES, OR GOODS TO A PATIENT SO AS TO EXPLOIT THE PATIENT FOR
FINANCIAL GAIN;
(10) WILLFULLY MAKES OR FILES A FALSE REPORT OR RECORD WHILE
PRACTICING AS AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT;
(11) WILLFULLY FAILS TO FILE OR RECORD ANY REPORT AS REQUIRED
UNDER LAW, WILLFULLY IMPEDES OR OBSTRUCTS THE FILING OR RECORDING OF A
REPORT, OR INDUCES ANOTHER TO FAIL TO FILE OR RECORD A REPORT;
(12) BREACHES PATIENT CONFIDENTIALITY;

SENATE BILL 951 11
(13) PAYS OR AGREES TO PAY ANY SUM OR PROVIDE ANY FORM OF
REMUNERATION OR MATERIAL BENEFIT TO ANY PERSON FOR BRINGING OR
REFERRING A PATIENT OR ACCEPTS OR AGREES TO ACCEPT ANY SUM OR ANY FORM
OF REMUNERATION OR MATERIAL BENEFIT FROM AN INDIVIDUAL FOR BRINGING OR
REFERRING A PATIENT;
(14) WILLFULLY MAKES A MISREPRESENTATION WHILE PRACTICING
AS AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT;
(15) WILLFULLY PRACTICES AS AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT
WITH AN UNAUTHORIZED INDIVIDUAL OR AIDS AN UNAUTHORIZED INDIVIDUAL IN
PRACTICING AS AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT;
(16) WILLFULLY DELEGATES AN ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT DUTY
TO AN UNLICENSED INDIVIDUAL;
(17) ESTABLISHES A PATTERN OF EXCESSIVE OR MEDICALLY
UNNECESSARY PROCEDURES OR TREATMENT;
(18) OFFERS, UNDERTAKES, OR AGREES TO CURE OR TREAT DISEASE
BY A SECRET METHOD, TREATMENT, OR MEDICINE;
(19) IS DISCIPLINED BY A LICENSING OR DISCIPLINARY AUTHORITY OR
IS CONVICTED OR DISCIPLINED BY A COURT OF ANY STATE OR COUNTRY OR IS
DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS FOR AN ACT THAT WOULD BE GROUNDS FOR
DISCIPLINARY ACTION UNDER THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
(20) FAILS TO MEET APPROPRIATE STANDARDS FOR THE DELIVERY OF
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT SERVICES;
(21) WILLFULLY SUBMITS FALSE STATEMENTS TO COLLECT FEES FOR
WHICH SERVICES ARE NOT PROVIDED;
(22) (I) HAS BEEN SUBJECT TO INVESTIGATION OR DISCIPLINARY
ACTION BY A LICENSING OR DISCIPLINARY AUTHORITY OR BY A COURT OF ANY
STATE OR COUNTRY FOR AN ACT THAT WOULD BE GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINARY
ACTION UNDER THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY STATUTES; AND
(II) HAS:
1. SURRENDERED THE LICENSE, IF ANY, ISSUED BY THE
STATE OR COUNTRY; OR

SENATE BILL 951
2. ALLOWED THE LICENSE, IF ANY, ISSUED BY THE
STATE OR COUNTRY TO EXPIRE OR LAPSE;
(23) WILLFULLY FAILS TO REPORT SUSPECTED CHILD ABUSE IN
VIOLATION OF § 5–704 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE;
(24) PRACTICES OR ATTEMPTS TO PRACTICE BEYOND THE
AUTHORIZED SCOPE OF PRACTICE;
(25) REFUSES, WITHHOLDS FROM, DENIES, OR DISCRIMINATES
AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL WITH REGARD TO THE PROVISION OF PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES FOR WHICH THE LICENSEE IS LICENSED AND QUALIFIED TO RENDER
BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL IS HIV POSITIVE;
(26) PRACTICES OR ATTEMPTS TO PRACTICE AS AN
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT IF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE HAS NOT
RECEIVED EDUCATION AND TRAINING IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE PROCEDURE;
(27) FAILS TO COOPERATE WITH A LAWFUL INVESTIGATION OF THE
BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL;
(28) FAILS TO COMPLETE A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK
UNDER § 14–308.1 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(29) VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE OR ANY RULE OR
REGULATION PERTAINING TO ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANTS THAT IS ADOPTED BY
THE BOARD, THE STATE, OR THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THE ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEDURE ACT, BEFORE THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL TAKES ANY
ACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, IT SHALL GIVE THE INDIVIDUAL
AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING
BEFORE THE BOARD OR THE DISCIPLINARY PANEL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
HEARING REQUIREMENTS OF § 14–405 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) (1) ON THE FILING OF CERTIFIED DOCKET ENTRIES WITH THE BOARD
BY THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, A DISCIPLINARY PANEL SHALL ORDER
THE SUSPENSION OF A LICENSE IF THE LICENSEE IS CONVICTED OF OR PLEADS
GUILTY OR NOLO CONTENDERE WITH RESPECT TO A CRIME INVOLVING MORAL
TURPITUDE, WHETHER OR NOT ANY APPEAL OR OTHER PROCEEDING IS PENDING TO
HAVE THE CONVICTION OR PLEA SET ASIDE.

SENATE BILL 951 13
(2) AFTER COMPLETION OF THE APPELLATE PROCESS, IF THE
CONVICTION HAS NOT BEEN REVERSED OR THE PLEA HAS NOT BEEN SET ASIDE WITH
RESPECT TO A CRIME INVOLVING MORAL TURPITUDE, A DISCIPLINARY PANEL
SHALL ORDER THE REVOCATION OF A LICENSE ON THE CERTIFICATION BY THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(D) (1) IF, AFTER A HEARING UNDER § 14–405 OF THIS TITLE, A
DISCIPLINARY PANEL FINDS THAT THERE ARE GROUNDS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION TO SUSPEND OR REVOKE A LICENSE, TO REPRIMAND A LICENSEE, OR
TO PLACE A LICENSEE ON PROBATION, THE DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A
FINE SUBJECT TO THE BOARD’S REGULATIONS IN ADDITION TO SUSPENDING OR
REVOKING THE LICENSE, REPRIMANDING THE LICENSEE, OR PLACING THE
LICENSEE ON PROBATION.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL PAY ANY FINES COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(E) IN ADDITION TO ANY SANCTION AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION, A
DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY REQUIRE A LICENSEE TO COMPLY WITH SPECIFIED
TERMS AND CONDITIONS DETERMINED BY THE DISCIPLINARY PANEL.
14–5H–16.
(A) (1) ANY PERSON AGGRIEVED BY A FINAL DECISION OF THE BOARD OR
A DISCIPLINARY PANEL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY TAKE A DIRECT JUDICIAL
APPEAL.
(2) THE APPEAL SHALL BE MADE AS PROVIDED FOR JUDICIAL
REVIEW OF FINAL DECISIONS IN THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT.
(B) AN ORDER OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY NOT BE
STAYED PENDING REVIEW.
(C) THE BOARD MAY APPEAL FROM ANY DECISION THAT REVERSES OR
MODIFIES AN ORDER OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before October 1, 2027,
the State Board of Physicians shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out this Act,
including establishing the date by which the Board shall begin accepting applications for
licensure under this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.